Utah statutes.
7-24-302.   Examination of books, accounts, and records by the department.

(1)  The department may examine the books, accounts, and records of a title lender and may make investigations to determine compliance with this chapter.

(2)  In accordance with Section 7-1-401, a title lender shall pay a fee for an examination conducted under Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 236, 2003 General Session

